apertium-pes.pes.dix
    <pardef n="past_endings">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imp_endings">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="imp_endings2" c="the attach to final stem vowels">
      <e><p><l/><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pres_endings">
      <e><p><l>م</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>د</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="pres_endings2" c="the attach to final stem vowels">
      <e><p><l>یم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئی</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ییم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئیم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ئید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>یند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="perfect_endings">
      <e><p><l>ه‌ام</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ای</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌است</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌ایم</l><r><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌اید</l><r><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه‌اند</l><r><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="کرد/ن__vblex" c="preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="past_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprf"/></r></p><par n="perfect_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="نکرد/ن__vblex" c="negative preterite (past)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="past_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pprf"/></r></p><par n="perfect_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ن</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex" c="imperfect (past cont.)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="cont"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="past_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex" c="negative imperfect (past cont.)">
      <e><p><l></l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="cont"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="past_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="بکن__vblex" c="subjunctive">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="بیا__vblex" c="subjunctive final stem vowel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings2"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings2"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نکن__vblex" c="negative subjunctive">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="نیا__vblex" c="negative subjunctive final stem vowel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings2"/></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings2"/></e>
    </pardef>
                            
    <pardef n="می‌کن__vblex" c="present">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cont"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="می‌ا__vblex" c="present final stem vowel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cont"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings2"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نمی‌کن__vblex" c="negative present">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="cont"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>
    </pardef>
    
    <pardef n="نمی‌ا__vblex" c="negative present final stem vowel">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="vblex"/><s n="neg"/><s n="cont"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings2"/></e>
    </pardef>
    

    <pardef n="/VERBS">

                              <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="past_endings"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__prefixes"/><p><l>ه</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><j/></r></p><par n="zwnj_or_space"/><par n="perfect_endings"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l>ان</l><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>

                              <e><par n="P__imp__prefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p><par n="imp_endings"/></e>

      
      
                              <e><par n="P__njprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>

                              <e><par n="P__jprefixes"/><p><l/><r>ن<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/></r></p><par n="pres_endings"/></e>

    </pardef>
</pardefs>

    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>آمد</l><r>آمد</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>نیامد</l><r>آمد</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>می‌آمد</l><r>آمد</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>نمی‌آمد</l><r>آمد</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>بیا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="بیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>نیا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="نیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>می‌ا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن" r="LR"><p><l>میا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن"><p><l>نمی‌ا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آمدن" r="LR"><p><l>نمیا</l><r>آمدن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>اندوخت</l><r>اندوخت</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>نیاندوخت</l><r>اندوخت</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>می‌اندوخت</l><r>اندوخت</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>نمی‌اندوخت</l><r>اندوخت</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>بیاندوز</l><r>اندوختن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>نیاندوز</l><r>اندوختن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>می‌اندوز</l><r>اندوختن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="اندوختن"><p><l>نمی‌اندوز</l><r>اندوختن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>انباشت</l><r>انباشت</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>نیانباشت</l><r>انباشت</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>می‌انباشت</l><r>انباشت</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>بیانبار</l><r>انباشتن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>نیانبار</l><r>انباشتن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>می‌انبار</l><r>انباشتن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="انباشتن"><p><l>نمی‌انبار</l><r>انباشتن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>افشرد</l><r>افشرد</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>نیافشرد</l><r>افشرد</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>می‌افشرد</l><r>افشرد</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>نمی‌افشرد</l><r>افشرد</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>بیافشر</l><r>افشردن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>نیافشر</l><r>افشردن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>می‌افشر</l><r>افشردن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افشردن"><p><l>نمی‌افشر</l><r>افشردن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن"><p><l>بیافزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="بیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن"><p><l>نیافزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="نیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن"><p><l>می‌افزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن" r="LR"><p><l>میافزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن"><p><l>نمی‌افزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افزودن" r="LR"><p><l>نمیافزا</l><r>افزودن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>افروزاند</l><r>افروزاند</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>نیافروزاند</l><r>افروزاند</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>می‌افروزاند</l><r>افروزاند</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>نمی‌افروزاند</l><r>افروزاند</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>بیافروزان</l><r>افروزاندن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>نیافروزان</l><r>افروزاندن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>می‌افروزان</l><r>افروزاندن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروزاندن"><p><l>نمی‌افروزان</l><r>افروزاندن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروختن"><p><l>بیافراز</l><r>افروختن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروختن"><p><l>نیافراز</l><r>افروختن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروختن"><p><l>می‌افراز</l><r>افروختن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افروختن"><p><l>نمی‌افراز</l><r>افروختن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>افراشت</l><r>افراشت</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>نیافراشت</l><r>افراشت</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>می‌افراشت</l><r>افراشت</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>نمی‌افراشت</l><r>افراشت</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>بیافراز</l><r>افراشتن</r></p><par n="بکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>نیافراز</l><r>افراشتن</r></p><par n="نکن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>می‌افراز</l><r>افراشتن</r></p><par n="می‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="افراشتن"><p><l>نمی‌افراز</l><r>افراشتن</r></p><par n="نمی‌کن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>آزمود</l><r>آزمود</r></p><par n="کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>نیازمود</l><r>آزمود</r></p><par n="نکرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>می‌آزمود</l><r>آزمود</r></p><par n="می‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>نمی‌آزمود</l><r>آزمود</r></p><par n="نمی‌کرد/ن__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>بیآزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="بیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>نیآزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="نیا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>می‌آزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن" r="LR"><p><l>میآزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="می‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن"><p><l>نمی‌آزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="آزمودن" r="LR"><p><l>نمیآزما</l><r>آزمودن</r></p><par n="نمی‌ا__vblex"/></e>
                            <e lm=""><i/><par n="perfect_endings"/></e>
